Washington statutes.
RCW 33.24.295

Loans for nonbusiness family purposes—Limitation.

An association may invest not to exceed twenty percent of its assets in loans for any nonbusiness family purposes.

[ 1982 c 3 s 48; 1979 c 113 s 12; 1973 c 130 s 27.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.

Severability—1979 c 113: See note following RCW 33.04.020.

Severability—1973 c 130: See note following RCW 33.24.350.